Florida, session 2026, SB80.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSection 790.176, Florida Statutes, is created to 16 read: 17 790.176âRequirements for safe storage of firearms and 18 ammunition in motor vehicles and vessels.â 19 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 20 (a)ââMotor vehicleâ has the same meaning as in s. 21 320.01(1). 22 (b)ââTrunkâ means the fully enclosed and locked main 23 storage compartment of a motor vehicle which is not accessible 24 from the passenger compartment. The term does not include a 25 compartment that has a window, the bed of a pickup truck, or the 26 rear area of a hatchback, station wagon-type motor vehicle, or 27 sport utility motor vehicle. 28 (c)ââVesselâ has the same meaning as in s. 327.02. 29 (2)âA person who stores or leaves a firearm, whether loaded 30 or unloaded, or ammunition in a motor vehicle or vessel under 31 his or her control while the person is not in the motor vehicle 32 or vessel must keep the firearm or ammunition locked inside the 33 trunk, inside a locked utility or glove box, or inside a locked 34 container securely affixed to the motor vehicle or vessel. 35 (3)âA person who violates subsection (2) commits a 36 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 37 775.082 or s. 775.083. 38 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.